Louisiana, session 2026, SB332.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2418(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2418. Waste tires; Waste Tire Management Dedicated Fund Account
* * *
C. Waste Whole waste tires that are not subjected to processing or recycling
may not be deposited knowingly and intentionally in a landfill as a method of
ultimate disposal. However, notwithstanding any other law or rule to the contrary,
waste tires that have been prepared for disposal by cutting, separating, shredding, or
other means in accordance with the rules or standards of the department may be
disposed of in a landfill.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-605 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 332